Hawaii statutes.
§333F-21 Provision of services; family and
caregiver support. The director within the limits of state and federal
resources allocated or available for the purposes of this chapter shall provide
any services that may be necessary to maintain and enhance care giving in
community-based homes for persons with developmental disabilities. For the
purposes of this section, "family and caregiver support" means a
flexible and varied network of support which does not supplant community
resources, and which is capable of providing for the individual families caring
for persons with developmental disabilities. These services may include:

(1) In-home and out-of-home respite services for
families and care providers;

(2) The purchase of adaptive equipment such as bath
chairs and special positioning chairs not covered by health insurance or other
resources;

(3) Counseling services for families of care
providers concerning stresses and feelings about caring for persons with
developmental disabilities;

(4) Special supply purchases such as diapers and
special clothing required by persons with developmental disabilities;

(5) Homemaker and chore services;

(6) Transportation services not available through
existing resources in the community;

(7) Specialized therapy services for persons with
developmental disabilities not available through insurance, medicaid, or other
resources;

(8) Case management to help families and care
providers coordinate and access services available to persons with
developmental disabilities; and

(9) Provision, without regard to chapter 42F or
chapter 103F, of modifications to dwelling units to enable persons with
developmental disabilities with sensory limitation or mobility problems to
reside in community homes which require adaptive and safety alterations such as
the installation of ramps and porch lifts, bars and hand rails, widening of
doorways, removal of other architectural barriers, and the enlargement of bath
facilities to allow the movement and ensure the safety of the person with developmental
disabilities; provided that:

(A) There shall be an agreement between the
care provider and the department to ensure continued care in the home where the
modification is provided; and

(B) Modification costs shall be limited to
the amount of funds appropriated for the program for any individual client. [L
1990, c 324, §2; am L 1991, c 335, §10; am L 1995, c 189, §12; am L 1997, c
190, §6]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next